apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="поздн/ий__adj">
      <e><p>          <l>его</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ий</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>его</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ему</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>им</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ем</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ий</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>яя</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>юю</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ей</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ей</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ей</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ей</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ее</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ее</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>его</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ему</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>им</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ем</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>их</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ие</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>их</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>им</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ими</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>их</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ие</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ее</l><r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="пыл/ьный__adj">
      <e><p>          <l>ьного</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьный</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьного</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьному</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьным</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьном</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьный</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьная</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьную</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьной</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьной</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьной</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьной</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьное</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьное</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьного</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьному</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьным</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьном</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьных</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьные</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьных</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьным</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьными</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьных</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьные</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьнее</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьней</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ен</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="short"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьна</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="short"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьно</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="short"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ьны</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="short"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
          <e><p>          <l>ьно</l><r>ьный<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="аномальный"><i>аномал</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="поздний"><i>поздн</i><par n="поздн/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="показательный"><i>показател</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="прибыльный"><i>прибыл</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="привлекательный"><i>привлекател</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="пыльный"><i>пыл</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="самостоятельный"><i>самостоятел</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="центральный"><i>централ</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="экстремальный"><i>экстремал</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="эмоциональный"><i>эмоционал</i><par n="пыл/ьный__adj"/></e>
